Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-104.06
American Indian Day; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that American Indians were the first residents of the State of Nebraska. The Legislature further finds that these residents have made advances to the growth and development of the United States, the State of Nebraska, and their local communities, first through history and now through human and natural resources. The Legislature also finds that American Indians have made significant contributions and will continue to make contributions to the development of business, industry, education, the arts, and other areas which have made this country and this state a good place in which to live. The Legislature also finds that many of these contributions are unknown and unrecognized by many Nebraska citizens.

Laws 1983, LB 90, § 1.